Utah statutes.
7-7-36.   Actions necessary to avoid loss on loans and investments.

Nothing in this code shall be construed as denying to an association the right to invest its funds, operate a business, manage or deal in property, or take any other action reasonably necessary over whatever period of time may reasonably be necessary to avoid loss on a loan or investment made or an obligation created in good faith.

